Utah statutes.
9-7-201.   State Library Division -- Creation -- Purpose.

(1)  There is created within the department the State Library Division under the administration and general supervision of the executive director or the designee of the executive director.

(2)  The division shall be under the policy direction of the board.

(3)  The division shall function as the library authority for the state and is responsible for general library services, extension services, the preservation, distribution and exchange of state publications, legislative reference, and other services considered proper for a state library.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

